Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-201.02
Purchase of real or personal property; installment contracts authorized.

In addition to any other powers granted to it by law, a city of the primary class may enter into installment contracts for the purchase of real or personal property. Such contracts need not be restricted to a single year and may provide for the purchase of the property in installment payments to be paid over more than one fiscal year. This section shall be in addition to and notwithstanding the provisions of a home rule charter.

Laws 1988, LB 978, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1175, § 1.